Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3319
License holder; motion or application to modify support order; effect.

If the license holder files a motion or application to modify a support order, the department, county attorney, or authorized attorney, upon notification by the license holder, shall stay the action to certify the license holder under section 43-3318 until disposition of the motion or application by the court or agency of competent jurisdiction. If the license holder requests review of the support order under section 43-512.12, the department shall stay the action to certify the license holder pending final disposition of the review and modification process.

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 19;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 157.